Utah statutes.
7-7-33.   Investments in loans -- Payments to protect real estate loans --
Requiring borrower to pay taxes, insurance, and other charges on real estate
in advance.
(1)  An association may invest in or otherwise acquire loans and interests in
loans, secured or unsecured, of any type, amount, and for any purpose,
including:
(a)  loans evidenced by a participation certificate, mortgage-backed bond or
note, or mortgage pass-through certificate;
(b)  personal loans evidenced by promissory notes;
(c)  loans containing variable, renegotiable, graduated payment, shared
appreciation, or other alternative payment features or any combinations of
those features;
(d)  loans secured by the pledge of policies of life insurance;
(e)  loans which are callable upon transfer of the security therefor;
(f)  loans to financial institutions, brokers and dealers, secured by loans,
obligations or investments in which the association could invest directly or
unsecured loans to subsidiary corporations whether or not those corporations
are controlled by the association;
(g)  loans for the payment of expenses of college or applied technology
education;
(h)  loans on the security of its savings accounts and loans specifically
related to negotiable order-of-withdrawal accounts;
(i)  loans secured by deeds of trust, mortgages or real estate contracts on
interests in real property whether for the acquisition or improvement of homes
or of real property or for other purposes, subject only to the conditions
specified in Subsections (2) and (3); and
(j)  commercial loans to partnerships, corporations, or trusts which are
operated for profit.
(2)  No association shall make a loan to one person if the sum of (a) the
amount of the loan and (b) the total balance of all outstanding loans owed to
the association and its service corporation subsidiaries by that person
exceeds an amount equal to 15% of the association's equity capital.
(3)  No association shall make any loan authorized by this section unless it
first has determined that the type, amount, purpose, and repayment provisions
of the loan in relation to the borrower's resources and credit standing
support the reasonable belief that the loan will be financially sound and will
be repaid according to its terms, and that the loan is not otherwise unlawful.
(4) (a)  An association may pay taxes, assessments, ground rents, insurance
premiums, and other similar charges for the protection of its real estate
loans.
(b)  All such payments shall be added to the unpaid balance of the loan and
shall be equally secured by the first lien on the property as the original
amounts advanced.
(c)  An association may require life insurance to be assigned as additional
collateral upon any real estate loan, and if it does so require, the
association shall obtain a first lien upon the policy and may advance premiums
thereon, and the premium advances shall be added to the unpaid balance of the
loan and shall be equally secured by the first lien on the property as the
original amount advanced.
(5) (a)  An association may require, subject to the provisions of the Interest
on Mortgage Loan Reserve Accounts Act, Sections 7-17-1 through 7-17-10, that a
borrower pay monthly in advance, in addition to interest or interest and
principal payments, the equivalent of 1/12 of the estimated annual taxes,
assessments, insurance premiums, ground rents, and other charges upon the real
estate securing a loan, or any of those charges, so as to enable the
association to pay the charges as they become due from the funds so received.
(b)  The amount of the monthly payments may be increased or decreased to
provide reasonably for the payment of the estimated annual taxes, assessments,
insurance premiums, and other charges.
(c)  If the association advances its own funds for the purposes stated, that
amount shall be secured by the association's mortgage or trust deed, if any,
with the same priority as the original amount advanced under the mortgage or
trust deed.
